Idaho, session 2026, S1324.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 1-2404, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
1-2404. NUMBER OF JUDGES -- QUALIFICATIONS -- CONDUCT AND DISCIPLINE
-- TERM -- ELECTION -- SELECTION -- COMPENSATION. (1) The court of appeals
shall consist of four (4) judges, and shall sit in panels of not less than
three (3) judges each.
(2) To be elected or appointed to the office of judge of the court of ap-
peals a person must, at the time of such election or appointment, meet all of
the following qualifications:
(a) Be at least thirty (30) years of age;
(b) Be a citizen of the United States and an elector of the state of
Idaho;
(c) Have been a legal resident of the state of Idaho for at least two (2)
continuous years immediately preceding such election or appointment;
(d) Have been in good standing as an active or judicial member of the
Idaho state bar for at least two (2) continuous years immediately pre-
ceding such election or appointment; and
(e) Have held a license to practice law or held a judicial office in one
(1) or more jurisdictions for at least ten (10) continuous years immedi-
ately preceding such election or appointment.
(3) No person who has been appointed by the governor to fill a vacancy on
the court of appeals is eligible to be a candidate for election to that same
seat at the next election held for such seat following the appointment.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the follow-
ing meanings:
(a) "Active," "judicial" and "good standing" have the same definitions
as those terms are given by rule 301 of the Idaho bar commission rules or
any successors to those rules;
(b) "Jurisdiction" means a state or territory of the United States, the
District of Columbia or any branch of the United States military; and
(c) "Elector" means one who is lawfully registered to vote.
(3) (5) A judge of the court of appeals shall be governed by the code of
judicial conduct as promulgated by the Idaho supreme court, and shall be sub-


ject to removal, discipline, or retirement pursuant to section 1-2103, Idaho
Code.
(4) (6)(a) Judges of the court of appeals shall be appointed by the gov-
ernor effective the first Monday of January, 1982, for the following
initial terms: one (1) judge shall be appointed for a term to expire on
the first Monday of January, 1985, one (1) judge shall be appointed for a
term expiring two (2) years later, and one (1) judge shall be appointed
for a term expiring two (2) further years later. Thereafter, the term of
office of a judge of the court of appeals shall be six (6) years.
(b) Vacancies in the office of judge of the court of appeals shall be
filled in the same manner as vacancies in the office of supreme court
justice or district judge.
(c) The positions of judges of the Idaho court of appeals shall first
be filled as vacancies. The judicial council shall submit to the gov-
ernor its recommendations for the offices at the earliest practicable
time after the effective date of this act. The governor may make the ap-
pointment at any time thereafter, to be effective the first Monday of
January, 1982, for the terms set forth in subsection (4) paragraph (a)
of this subsection.
(d) In making its nominations for the initial vacancies to be created
by this act, the Idaho judicial council shall submit the names of not
less than six (6) nor more than nine (9) qualified persons for the ini-
tial three (3) vacancies to be created by this act. Otherwise, the ju-
dicial council shall submit the names of not less than two (2) nor more
than four (4) persons for each vacancy. The governor shall appoint the
judges, identifying each appointment by the length of the term of ap-
pointment.
(e) Nominations and appointments to fill initial or subsequent vacan-
cies shall be made with due regard for balanced geographical membership
of the court of appeals.
(f) Subsequent terms of office of a judge who has been appointed to the
court of appeals shall be subject to a statewide nonpartisan election
to be held in the primary election next preceding the expiration of an
appointed term in the same method and manner as a justice of the supreme
court.
(g) A fourth judge of the court of appeals shall be appointed by the gov-
ernor effective the first Monday of January, 2009, for an initial term
to expire on the first Monday of January, 2013. Thereafter, the term of
office for this position shall be six (6) years. The judicial council
shall submit the names of not less than two (2) nor more than four (4)
persons for the initial vacancy in this position under the procedure set
forth in section 1-2102, Idaho Code. This position shall be subject to
all of the provisions relating to qualifications, removal, discipline,
retirement, filling of vacancies, election and compensation set forth
in this chapter.
(5) (7) Judges of the court of appeals, except for judges who have made
an election to remain in the public employee retirement system of Idaho pur-
suant to section 1-2011, Idaho Code, shall receive compensation upon retire-
ment as provided in chapter 20, title 1, Idaho Code.


SECTION 2. That Section 34-615, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-615. ELECTION -- SELECTION -- OF JUSTICES OF THE SUPREME COURT --
QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the primary election, 1972, and every alternate year
thereafter, subject to the provisions of section 34-1217, Idaho Code, there
shall be elected justices of the supreme court to fill any vacancy or vacan-
cies occasioned by the expiration of the term or terms of office of any member
or members.
(2) To be elected or appointed to the office of justice of the supreme
court a person must, at the time of such election or appointment, meet all of
the following qualifications:
(a) Be at least thirty (30) years of age;
(b) Be a citizen of the United States and an elector of the state of
Idaho;
(c) Have been a legal resident of the state of Idaho for at least two (2)
continuous years immediately preceding such election or appointment;
(d) Have been in good standing as an active or judicial member of the
Idaho state bar for at least two (2) continuous years immediately pre-
ceding such election or appointment; and
(e) Have held a license to practice law or held a judicial office in one
(1) or more jurisdictions for at least ten (10) continuous years immedi-
ately preceding such election or appointment.
(3) No person who has been appointed by the governor to fill a vacancy on
the supreme court is eligible to be a candidate for election to that same seat
at the next election held for such seat following the appointment.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the follow-
ing meanings:
(a) "Active," "judicial" and "good standing" have the same definitions
as those terms are given by rule 301 of the Idaho bar commission rules or
any successors to those rules;
(b) "Jurisdiction" means a state or territory of the United States, the
District of Columbia or any branch of the United States military; and
(c) "Elector" means one who is lawfully registered to vote.
(3) (5) Each candidate for election shall file a declaration of candi-
dacy with the secretary of state.
(4) (6) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of three hundred dollars ($300) which shall be de-
posited in the general fund.
SECTION 3. That Section 34-616, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-616. ELECTION -- SELECTION -- OF DISTRICT JUDGES -- QUALIFICA-
TIONS. (1) At the primary election, 1974, and every four (4) years there-
after, subject to the provisions of section 34-1217, Idaho Code, there shall
be elected in each judicial district a sufficient number of district judges
to fill any vacancy or vacancies occasioned by the expiration of the term or
terms of office of any member or members.
(2) To be elected to the office of district judge a person must, at the
time of such election, meet all of the following qualifications:


(a) Be at least thirty (30) years of age;
(b) Be a citizen of the United States and an elector in the judicial dis-
trict in which elected for at least one (1) continuous year immediately
preceding such election;
(c) Have been a legal resident of the state of Idaho for at least two (2)
continuous years immediately preceding such election;
(d) Have been in good standing as an active or judicial member of the
Idaho state bar for at least two (2) continuous years immediately pre-
ceding such election; and
(e) Have held a license to practice law or held a judicial office in one
(1) or more jurisdictions for at least ten (10) continuous years immedi-
ately preceding such election.
(3) No person who has been appointed by the governor to fill a vacancy on
a district court is eligible to be a candidate for election to that same seat
at the next election held for such seat following the appointment.
(3) (4) Each candidate for election shall file a declaration of candi-
dacy with the secretary of state.
(4) (5) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) which shall be
deposited in the general fund.
(5) (6) To be appointed to the office of district judge a person must, at
the time of such appointment, meet all of the following qualifications:
(a) Be at least thirty (30) years of age;
(b) Be a citizen of the United States and an elector of the state of
Idaho in the judicial district in which the vacancy is being filled for
at least one (1) continuous year immediately preceding the appointment;
(c) Have been a legal resident of the state of Idaho for at least two (2)
continuous years immediately preceding such appointment;
(d) Have been in good standing as an active or judicial member of the
Idaho state bar for at least two (2) continuous years immediately pre-
ceding such appointment; and
(e) Have held a license to practice law or held a judicial office in one
(1) or more jurisdictions for at least ten (10) continuous years immedi-
ately preceding such appointment.
(6) (7) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the fol-
lowing meanings:
(a) "Active," "judicial" and "good standing" have the same definitions
as those terms are given by rule 301 of the Idaho bar commission rules or
any successors to those rules;
(b) "Jurisdiction" means a state or territory of the United States, the
District of Columbia or any branch of the United States military; and
(c) "Elector" means one who is lawfully registered to vote.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.